District of Columbia statutes.
32-1613

Disclosure of information by the Council.

The Council shall not withhold information from the public regarding its operations, procedures, and decisions that would otherwise be subject to disclosure under subchapter II of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 14, 47 DCR 4644
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 129(i), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction by substituting “Council” for “Board”.